District of Columbia statutes.
15-714

Witness fees for attendance in Superior Court.

(a)

The fees and travel allowances to be paid any witness attending in a criminal case in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall be the same as those paid to witnesses who attend before the United States District Court for the District of Columbia.

(b)

The fees and travel allowances to be paid any witness compelled by subpoena to attend any branch of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia other than the criminal division shall be the same amount as paid a witness compelled to attend before the United States District Court for the District of Columbia.

(c)

No travel allowance shall be paid to any witness residing within the District of Columbia.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 536, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Dec. 27, 1967, 81 Stat. 742, Pub. L. 90-226, title VIII, § 803(a)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 554, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(15)(A)
Fees of jurors serving in Superior Court, see § 11-1906.
This section is referenced in § 11-1527.
1981 Ed., § 15-714.
1973 Ed., § 15-714.